hr-HR: Konfiguracija žica mandoline: 10 žica / 5 zborova; 12 žica / 6 zborova; 4 žice / 4 zbora; 8 žica / 4 zbora; Ostalo
fr: Configuration des cordes de la mandoline: 10 cordes / 5 chœurs; 12 cordes / 6 chœurs; 4 cordes / 4 chœurs; 8 cordes / 4 chœurs; Autre
sl-SI: Konfiguracija strun za mandolino: 10 strun / 5 zborov; 12 strun / 6 zborov; 4 strune / 4 zbori; 8 strun / 4 zbori; Drugo
nl: Snarenconfiguratie mandoline: 10 snaren / 5 koren; 12 snaren / 6 koren; 4 snaren / 4 koren; 8 snaren / 4 koren; Anders
en: Mandolin string configuration: 10 strings / 5 courses; 12 strings / 6 courses; 4 strings / 4 courses; 8 strings / 4 courses; Other
bg-BG: Конфигурация на струните на мандолината: 10 струни / 5 хора; 12 струни / 6 хора; 4 струни / 4 хора; 8 струни / 4 хора; Друго
da: Konfiguration af mandolinstreng: 10 strenge/5 kor; 12 strenge/6 kor; 4 strenge/4 kor; 8 strenge/4 kor; Andet
de: Saitenart der Mandoline: 10 Saiten / 5 Chöre; 12 Saiten / 6 Chöre; 4 Saiten / 4 Chöre; 8 Saiten / 4 Chöre; Sonstige
nb: Strengekonfigurasjon for mandolin: 10 strenger / 5 kor; 12 strenger / 6 kor; 4 strenger / 4 kor; 8 strenger / 4 kor; Annet
ja: マンドリンストリング構造: 10弦 / 5コース; 12弦 / 6コース; 4弦 / 4コース; 8弦 / 4コース; その他
es: Configuración de cuerdas de la mandolina: 10 cuerdas/5 órdenes; 12 cuerdas/6 órdenes; 4 cuerdas/4 órdenes; 8 cuerdas/4 órdenes; Otra
ru: Конфигурация струн мандолины: 10 струн / 5 хоров; 12 струн / 6 хоров; 4 струны / 4 хора; 8 струн / 4 хора; Другое
hu: Mandolin húrkonfiguráció: 10 húros / 5 kórusos; 12 húros / 6 kórusos; 4 húros / 4 kórusos; 8 húros / 4 kórusos; Egyéb
tr: Mandolin tel konfigürasyonu: 10 tel/5 koro; 12 tel/6 koro; 4 tel/4 koro; 8 tel/4 koro; Diğer
zh-CN: 曼陀林琴弦配置: 10 弦/5 复弦; 12 弦/6 复弦; 4 弦/4 复弦; 8 弦/4 复弦; 其他
pt-PT: Configuração das cordas do bandolim: 10 cordas/5 ordens; 12 cordas/6 ordens; 4 cordas/4 ordens; 8 cordas/4 ordens; Outro
fi: Mandoliinin kielien konfiguraatio: 10 kieltä / 5 kuoroa; 12 kieltä / 6 kuoroa; 4 kieltä / 4 kuoroa; 8 kieltä / 4 kuoroa; Muu
pt-BR: Configuração das cordas do bandolim: 10 cordas / 5 ordens; 12 cordas / 6 ordens; 4 cordas / 4 ordens; 8 cordas / 4 ordens; Outro
cs: Konfigurace strun mandolíny: 10 strun / 5 sborů; 12 strun / 6 sborů; 4 struny / 4 sbory; 8 strun / 4 sbory; Jiné
pl: Konfiguracja strun mandoliny: 10 strun / 5 chórów; 12 strun / 6 chórów; 4 struny / 4 chóry; 8 strun / 4 chóry; Inne
ro-RO: Configurația corzilor mandolinei: 10 corzi / 5 perechi; 12 corzi / 6 perechi; 4 corzi / 4 grupuri; 8 corzi / 4 perechi; Altele
zh-TW: 曼陀林琴弦配置: 10 弦/5 組; 12 弦/6 組; 4 弦/4 組; 8 弦/4 組; 其他
sv: Strängkonfiguration för mandolin: 10 strängar / 5 körer; 12 strängar / 6 körer; 4 strängar / 4 körer; 8 strängar / 4 körer; Annat
it: Configurazione delle corde del mandolino: 10 corde / 5 cori; 12 corde / 6 cori; 4 corde / 4 cori; 8 corde / 4 cori; Altro
lt-LT: Mandolinos stygų konfigūracija: 10 stygų / 5 grupės; 12 stygų / 6 grupės; 4 stygos / 4 grupės; 8 stygos / 4 grupės; Kita
el: Διαμόρφωση χορδής μαντολίνου: 10 χορδές / 5 ζεύγη; 12 χορδές / 6 ζεύγη; 4 χορδές / 4 σειρές; 8 χορδές / 4 ζεύγη; Άλλο
th: โครงสร้างรูปแบบสายของแมนโดลิน: 10 สาย / 5 คอร์ส; 12 สาย / 6 คอร์ส; 4 สาย / 4 คอร์ส; 8 สาย / 4 คอร์ส; อื่นๆ
ko: 만돌린 현 구성: 10현 / 5코스; 12현 / 6코스; 4현 / 4코스; 8현 / 4코스; 기타
sk-SK: Konfigurácia mandolínových strún: 10 strún / 5 zborov; 12 strún / 6 zborov; 4 struny / 4 zbory; 8 strún / 4 zbory; Iná
vi: Cấu hình dây của đàn mandolin: 10 dây / 5 hàng; 12 dây / 6 hàng; 4 dây / 4 hàng; 8 dây / 4 hàng; Khác